Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 34

Brands and Marks

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. County clerk recording when two judicial districts, §14-15-901.

Fee for recording, §21-6-406.

Penalty for altering brand of another with intent to steal, §5-37-502.

2-34-101 — 2-34-105. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning earmark and brand to be recorded, age for branding and earmarking, brands or marks of minors, record of marks and brands, and rebranding or remarking purchased stock, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 19-23. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-34-101. Rev. Stat., ch. 93, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 333; Pope's Dig., § 348; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-801.

2-34-103. Rev. Stat., ch. 93, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 338; Pope's Dig., § 353; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-806.

2-34-105. Rev. Stat., ch. 93, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 337; Pope's Dig., § 352; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-805.

If a dispute arises about an earmark or brand, it shall be decided by reference to the book of marks and brands kept by the clerk of the county court.

A state-certified law enforcement officer or a livestock association in the state that is authorized to perform brand inspection services under 9 C.F.R. 201.86, as it existed on January 1, 2015, may order funds from the sale of an animal of questionable ownership held until ownership is established.

If ownership of the animal is not established within thirty (30) days, the funds shall be sent to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to be held for one (1) year from the date of receipt by the commission.

If ownership of the animal cannot be ascertained during the one-year period stated in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, then after the expiration of the one-year period, the funds shall be deposited into the Livestock and Poultry Fund Account.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “Impounding of funds” in the section heading; added designation (a); substituted “If a dispute arises about an” for “If any dispute shall arise about any”; and added (b).

The 2017 amendment inserted “from the sale” in (b)(1).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning branding or misbranding with intent to defraud, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 24. The section was derived from Acts 2015, No. 965, § 2.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3, deleted “Division of” preceding “Brand Registry” in the subchapter heading.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 93, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 335; Pope's Dig., § 350; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-803; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 1; 2017, No. 258, § 1.

2-34-107. [Repealed.]

2-34-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Brand” means for purposes of ownership identification a permanent identification burned or frozen into the hide of a live animal with a hot iron or hot or frozen chemical in letters, numbers, or figures, each of which is at least three inches (3") in overall length or diameter and is to be considered in relation to its location on the animal; and

“Livestock” and “animal” mean any bovine, horse, or mule.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “for purposes of ownership identification” in (1); deleted (2), (3), and (4); and redesignated former (5) as (2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “bovine” for “cattle” in (2).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning penalty, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 25. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 179, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-810; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 192; 2015, No. 965, § 3.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-807; Acts 1999, No. 14, § 1; 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2019, No. 378, § 5.

2-34-202. [Repealed.]

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall serve as an adjusting committee in the matter of determining conflicts of brands, and the decision of the committee shall be final.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-808; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

Publisher's Notes. When the Division of Brand Registry was created by Acts 1959, No. 179, it was part of the State Livestock Sanitary Board, whose functions, etc., were transferred to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission by Acts 1963, No. 87, § 10.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (a)(1), (a)(2), and designation (b); substituted “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” for “commission”; and rewrote the section heading.

2-34-204. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning rules, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 179, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-808; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

2-34-205. Custody of county brand records.

All county brand records of the various counties of the state shall be property of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, and it shall be unlawful for a county clerk to accept a brand for registry.

The Department of Agriculture shall collect all county brand record books and place them in its office and preserve them as public records on behalf of the commission.

The department shall furnish a record of any brand record in the county record books to any person for a reasonable fee determined by the department to offset the costs of furnishing the record.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), deleted “Division of Brand Registry in the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock” and substituted “a” for “any” twice; substituted “commission” for “division” in (b) and (c); and substituted “reasonable fee determined by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to offset the costs of furnishing the record” for “fee of one dollar ($1.00) per brand” in (c).

The 2017 amendment deleted “the Executive Director of” following “determined by” in (c).

The 2019 amendment, in (b), substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “commission” and added “on behalf of the commission”; and substituted “department” for “commission” twice in (c).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1959, No. 179, § 5, provided, in part, that immediately upon receipt of the brand record books for the respective counties, the Director of Brand Registry should notify each holder of a brand that the division was in existence.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 7, provided, in part, that all brand applications passed upon and approved should be sorted in a systematic manner and published in the first edition of the State Brand Book, which was to be published on or before January 1, 1960.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted “Executive”, deleted “Division of Brand Registry in the” twice preceding “Arkansas Livestock”, deleted “and every” following “each”, and deleted “and regulations” following “rules”; in (b), inserted “executive”, substituted “shall publish” for “will have published”, and “commission before” for “division prior to”; and substituted “annually” for “every three (3) months” in (c).

The 2017 amendment deleted “Executive Director of the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock” in (a); and substituted “The commission” for “The executive director” in (b).

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-809; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 31.

2-34-206. State Brand Book.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall publish the State Brand Book, which shall contain a facsimile of each brand and mark that is registered with the commission showing the name and address of the owner, together with the pertinent laws and rules pertaining to registration and reregistration of brands and marks.

The commission, on or before January 1, 1960, and every five (5) years thereafter, shall publish the State Brand Book showing all the brands recorded with the commission before December 1, 1959, and every five (5) years thereafter.

Supplements to the State Brand Book shall be published annually.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, §§ 2, 5, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-808, 78-811, 78-813; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 28.

2-34-207. Notification to registrants.

Before publication of a revised State Brand Book, each registered brand owner or assignee in the previous book or supplements shall be notified in writing that his or her brand has terminated and that the brand must be renewed if the person desires to keep the brand.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-813; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Before” for “Prior to”, “a revised” for “any revised”, “each” for “all”, “owner or assignee” for “owners and assignees”, deleted “thereto” following “supplements”, and substituted “his or her” for “their”.

2-34-208. Registration of brands.

A person desiring to adopt a brand or to continue to use a brand shall apply to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission for the registration of the brand in the manner prescribed in this section.

The commission shall prepare a standard form, which shall be made available to those persons who desire to apply for a brand.

An applicant shall show a front, rear, left, and right side view of the animals upon which the brand will be eligible for registry.

The brand location shall be designated in the following body regions: head, right jaw, neck, shoulder, rib and right and left jaw, neck, shoulder, rib and neck, right and left hip, thigh, and breeching.

The applicant shall select at least three (3):

Distinct brands and list them in the preferred order; and

Locations on the animal and list them in preferred order.

Applications for registration or reregistration shall be properly signed and notarized and accompanied by a reasonable fee to be determined by the commission to offset the costs of administering this section.

A brand, if approved and accepted by the commission for registry, shall be of good standing during the five-year period in which it is recorded.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1959, No. 179, § 6, provided that, from the effective date of the act until September 1, 1959, the Division of Brand Registry would accept brand registration applications only from persons having brands registered in the county brand books. It also provided that, from September 1 until December 1, 1959, the division would accept applications from any persons desiring to register brands and that the division would check the applications immediately for conflicts and, if found, return the fee advanced along with the application to the applicant.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “apply” for “make application” and deleted “Division of Brand Registry in the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission”; substituted “commission” for “division” in (b); substituted “An applicant” for “The applicants” in (c); in (e), substituted “at least three (3)” for “not less than three (3)” and inserted designations (1) and (2); substituted “reasonable fee to be determined by the executive director to offset the costs of administering this section” for “fee of five dollars ($5.00)” in (f); and substituted “commission” for “division” in (g).

The 2017 amendment deleted “the Executive Director of” following “determined by” in (f).

Claimed as reactors to:

Brucellosis abortus, known as Bang’s disease; or

Tuberculosis, known as T.B.; or

Designated for slaughter.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted the first occurrence of “‘S’” and substituted “is unlawful” for “shall be unlawful”, “a person” for “any person”, and the second occurrence of “the brands of ‘B’, ‘S’, and ‘T’” for “them”; inserted designations (b)(1), (b)(1)(A), and (b)(1)(B); and added (b)(2).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1959, No. 179, § 8, provided, in part, that the original State Brand Book would sell for five dollars ($5.00).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “to the State Brand Book” for “thereto” and “a reasonable fee to be determined by the executive director to offset the costs of producing the book” for “ten dollars ($10.00)”; and substituted “to the public for a reasonable fee determined by the executive director to offset the costs of producing the book” for “at fifty cents (50¢) each” in (b).

The 2017 amendment deleted “the Executive Director of” following “be determined by” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 378 inserted “copies of” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” in (b).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “to the current edition of the State Brand Book” for “thereto” in (a); and substituted “to the State Brand Book” for “thereto” in (b).

The fee for recording a transfer of title shall be determined by the commission based on the costs of administering this section.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “to the current edition of the State Brand Book” for “thereto” in (a)(1) and (b)(1); redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B); in (a)(2)(A), substituted “must” for “shall” and deleted “Division of Brand Registry in the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission”; in (a)(2)(B), substituted “a transfer of title” for “it” and “determined by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission based on the costs of administering this section” for “one dollar ($1.00)”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “If the purchaser suffers” for “Should the purchaser suffer any”, “is liable for the damages” for “shall be liable for any and all damages”, and “a court” for “any court”.

The 2017 amendment deleted “the Executive Director of” following “be determined by” in (a)(2)(B).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Brand Registry Fund, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 32. The section was derived from Acts 1961, No. 204, § 1; 1969, No. 361, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-818; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

(1)All persons selling livestock branded with their brand recorded in a current edition of the State Brand Book or supplements to the current edition of the State Brand Book shall execute a written transfer of ownership to the purchaser.

(1)The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall enter into a contract with a private entity that operates primarily as a livestock association to administer the registration and recording of marks and brands under this subchapter.

Compensate the private entity for its services;

Appoint the private entity as an agent of the commission for purposes of receiving fees allowed under this subchapter; and

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, direct the private entity to perform duties assigned to the commission or the Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission under this subchapter.

The commission shall not contract with a private entity to promulgate rules or set fees under this subchapter.

Records concerning the administration of this subchapter are subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., regardless of whether the records are in the custody or control of the commission or a private entity acting as an agent of the commission under this section.

A private entity entering into a contract with the commission under this section shall:

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “Executive Director of the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock” in (a)(1); substituted “commission” for “executive director” twice in the introductory language of (a)(2), once in (b) and once in the introductory language of (d).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning drovers, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 34. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-34-301. Acts 1868, No. 29, § 5, p. 101; C. & M. Dig., § 264; Pope's Dig., § 278; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1005; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 18.

2-34-302. Acts 1868, No. 29, § 1, p. 101; C. & M. Dig., § 260; Pope's Dig., § 274; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1001.

2-34-303. Acts 1868, No. 29, § 2, p. 101; C. & M. Dig., § 261; Pope's Dig., § 275; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1002; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 5.

2-34-304. Acts 1868, No. 29, §§ 3, 4, p. 101; C. & M. Dig., §§ 262, 263; Pope's Dig., §§ 276, 277; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1003, 78-1004.

C.J.S. 3 C.J.S., Agri., § 175 et seq.

[Reserved.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning delivering, transporting, or selling of livestock, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 35. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-35-201. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 7; Pope’s Dig., § 3234; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-907.

2-35-202. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 3233; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-906.

2-35-203. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 14; Pope's Dig., § 3241; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-914; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 234.

2-35-204. Acts 1937, No. 206, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 3228, 3229; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-901, 78-902.

2-35-205. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 3239; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-912.

2-35-206. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 3230; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-903.

2-35-207. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 3240; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-913.

2-35-208. Acts 1937, No. 206, §§ 4, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 3231, 3236; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-904, 78-909.

2-35-209. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 3232; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-905.

2-35-210. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 3237; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-910.

2-35-211. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 3238; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-911.

2-35-212. Acts 1937, No. 206, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 3235; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-908.

2-35-213. Acts 1957, No. 227, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-915, 78-916.

2-35-214. Acts 1981, No. 770, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-917.

2-35-215. Acts 1923 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, §§ 1-3.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1987, No. 3, which is codified as §2-35-401 et seq., provides for the collection of the federal assessment of $1.00 per head on cattle sold in the state for the support of a beef promotion and research program.

Cross References. Powers and duties of the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and department, §26-17-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 160, § 13: Feb. 14, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act requires an extended period of time to fully implement; that funds generated by this act for promotion, market development, research, and other activities are needed at the earliest possible date; and that this act is necessary to provide a mechanism for enhancing Arkansas' cattle industry through promotional and developmental projects. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the efficient and effective implementation of this program shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, §§ 4, 5, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-810, 78-811, 78-813; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 29.

2-34-209. Brands reserved to state.

There is reserved to the state the brands of “B”, “S”, and “T” on the left jaw of any cattle, and it is unlawful for a person to use the brands of “B”, “S”, and “T”.

Cattle carrying these brands shall be:

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-816; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

2-34-210. Sale of book.

The State Brand Book and all supplements to the State Brand Book, for a five-year period, shall be sold to the public for a reasonable fee to be determined by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to offset the costs of producing the State Brand Book.

A supplement to the State Brand Book shall be sold to the public for a reasonable fee determined by the Department of Agriculture to offset the costs of producing the supplement.

The county clerk and the sheriff of each county shall receive copies of all State Brand Books and supplements without cost to their respective county.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-814; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 30; 2019, No. 378, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 32.

2-34-211. Book as evidence of ownership.

Brands appearing in the current edition of the State Brand Book or supplements to the current edition of the State Brand Book shall be prima facie evidence of ownership and shall take precedence over brands of like kind should the question of ownership arise.

The owner whose brand does not appear in the State Brand Book or supplement to the State Brand Book shall produce evidence to establish his or her title to the property in the event of controversy.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-815; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3.

2-34-212. Transfers of registered brands.

(1)Only brands appearing in the current edition of the State Brand Book and the supplements to the current edition of the State Brand Book shall be subject to sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest, the same as other personal property.

(A)The transfer of title shall be recorded with the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

If the purchaser suffers damages due to seller's failure to execute a written transfer of ownership, then the seller is liable for the damages decided upon by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 179, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-816, 78-817; Acts 2015, No. 965, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 31.

2-34-213. [Repealed.]

When the commission enters into a contract under this subsection, the commission shall:

Make a monthly accounting to the commission of all funds received by the private entity as an agency of the commission under this section; and

File with the commission a surety bond of a corporate surety authorized to do business in this state in an amount determined by the commission, conditioned on the faithful performance of the private entity's duties and obligations as an agent of the commission under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 965, § 4; 2017, No. 1011, § 33.

Subchapter 3

— Drovers

2-34-301 — 2-34-304. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Subchapter 2

— Delivering, Transporting, or Selling of Livestock

2-35-201 — 2-35-215. [Repealed.]

2-35-301. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the growth and development of the beef cattle industry in Arkansas by research, promotion, and market development and thereby promote the general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1901.

2-35-302. Penalty.

A buyer who fails to file a report or pay any assessment within a required time set by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall forfeit to the director a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due plus one percent (1%) for each month of delay, or fraction of a month, after the first month after the report was required to be filed or the assessment became due.

The penalty shall be paid to the director and shall be disposed of by him or her in the same manner as funds derived from payment of assessments imposed in this subchapter.

The director shall collect the penalty levied in this section, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

Voluntary payment by the person liable;

Legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Injunctive relief to enjoin any buyer owing the assessment or penalty from operating his or her business or engaging in business as a buyer of cattle until the delinquent assessment or penalty is paid.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this subchapter who refuses to allow full inspection of the records relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed in this subchapter or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent inspection shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c).

The council may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of the affairs of the council.

Within ninety (90) days after beginning the collection of the seventy-five-cent assessment, the council shall cause an election to be held on the question of the levy of an assessment of seventy-five cents (75¢) per head on all cattle sold in the state.

The election shall be held in the manner prescribed in subsections (a)-(c) of this section.

If a majority of the cattle owners and producers in the state voting at the election vote for the levy of the additional seventy-five cents (75¢) per head on cattle sold in the state, the assessment shall continue until either terminated by the council or until another election is held at which a majority of the cattle owners and producers in the state vote against the levy.

If a majority of the cattle owners and producers in the state voting at the election vote against the levy of the additional seventy-five cents (75¢) per head on cattle sold in the state, the assessment shall be discontinued and shall not be levied again unless and until the levy is thereafter approved at an election called by the council.

U.S. Code. The federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, referred to in (d), is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq.

Order buyers, who are registered or licensed, buying on order and not through a public market; and

Individual organizations, groups, or firms, in the case of organized sales, special sales, breed association sales, and feeder calf sales.

Arkansas beef promotion and research;

The operation and maintenance of the council office; and

Payment of expenses of the board members in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The Arkansas Beef Council shall plan and conduct or cause to be conducted a program of promotion, market development, research, or related beef activities designed to enhance the cattle industry in Arkansas.

(1)The council is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessment imposed in this subchapter for these purposes, including basic administration expenses of the plan.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1909; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 19.

2-35-303. Creation — Members — Organization.

The Arkansas Beef Council is created.

(1)The council shall be composed of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate as follows:

Three (3) cattle producer members shall represent the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation and shall be appointed from a list of names submitted by the board of directors of that organization;

Three (3) cattle producer members shall represent the Arkansas Cattlemen's Association and shall be appointed from a list of names submitted by the board of directors of that organization; and

One (1) member shall be an active Arkansas livestock market operator who shall be appointed from the state at large.

Each year, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of the current council members whose terms expire in that year, the organizations named shall submit to the Governor two (2) nominees for each position to be filled on the council from the respective organizations. The Governor shall appoint a succeeding member to the council from each organization's list of nominees.

Each member selected shall serve for a term of three (3) years and until his or her successor is duly selected as provided in this section.

Vacancies in any unexpired term shall be filled by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. The member appointed to fill the vacancy shall represent the same organization as the person whose term is unexpired.

Members of the council shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the council whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by those officers or specifically designated by the council.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1902.

2-35-304. Levy of assessment on cattle.

(1)Within ninety (90) days after February 14, 1983, the Arkansas Beef Council shall cause an election to be held on the question of the levy of an assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head on all cattle sold in the state.

The election shall be held at the offices of the United States Farm Service Agency in each county in the state.

The council shall set the date for conducting the election in each county, shall furnish ballots for the election, and shall prescribe voting procedures for the election.

Each cattle owner or producer who owned or produced cattle in the year immediately preceding the election may vote in the election.

(1)If a majority of the cattle owners and producers in the state voting at the election vote for the levy of an assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head on cattle sold in the state, the assessment shall be applicable to all sales made on and after a date specified by the council. The date shall not be later than ninety (90) days after certification of the results of the election.

The assessment shall be a continuing levy until either terminated by the council or until another election is held at which a majority of the cattle owners and producers in the state vote against the levy.

(1)When petitions containing the signatures of twenty percent (20%) of the cattle owners and producers in the state, as determined by the latest available agricultural census, are filed with the council requesting that the question of continuing the per-head assessment be submitted to a vote of the cattle owners and producers, the council shall cause an election to be held within ninety (90) days after the filing of the petitions.

The election shall be conducted in the same manner as the initial election held on the question of the levy of the assessment.

If a majority of the owners and producers voting at the election vote against the levy of the assessment, the assessment shall not be levied unless and until the levy is thereafter approved at an election called by the council.

If the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 and the administrative orders and rules adopted under it are discontinued for any reason, the assessment of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head of cattle sold in this state shall be reactivated the same as if the national program had never existed, and there is levied without any election an additional assessment of seventy-five cents (75¢) per head of cattle sold in this state to be collected as provided in §2-35-305 and disposed of as provided in §2-35-308.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1903; Acts 2003, No. 1331, §§ 1, 2.

2-35-305. Collection by purchasers.

(1)The assessment levied under this subchapter shall be collected by each purchaser of cattle in Arkansas, whether or not the purchaser is a resident of Arkansas.

A purchaser shall monthly report and remit the assessments collected to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration at the time, in the manner, and on forms prescribed by the director.

For purposes of this subchapter, purchasers or buyers of cattle shall include, but not be limited to:

Livestock auction markets;

Packers;

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1904.

2-35-306. Records and reports.

The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to adopt appropriate rules regarding records to be kept by cattle buyers and regarding reporting and remittance of the assessment levied in this subchapter and to prescribe forms upon which reports are to be made.

The director may, by rule, require the reports to contain such information as he or she shall deem necessary or appropriate to assure the proper enforcement of this subchapter and the efficient and effective collection of the assessment levied under it.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1905.

2-35-307. Inspection of records and rules.

Records maintained by cattle buyers under the requirements of this subchapter or rules of the Arkansas Beef Council adopted under it shall be made available for inspection at any reasonable time upon written request by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or any duly authorized agent or representative.

Buyers, at such times as the director may require, shall submit reports or other documents containing information deemed necessary for the efficient collection of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The director shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter at reasonable times upon the premises of buyers of cattle and examine or cause to be examined by the agent any records which may pertain to the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1906.

2-35-308. Disposition of funds.

The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall deposit all assessments and penalties collected under this subchapter in the State Treasury.

(1)After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the Constitutional and Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the Treasurer of State shall credit the remainder to the Arkansas Beef Council Fund, which is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

All funds so credited to the Arkansas Beef Council Fund shall be used in such manner as the council deems appropriate for:

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1907; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 7.

2-35-309. Program to enhance cattle industry.

Use of these funds may be applied as prescribed in this section within or without the State of Arkansas, including regional, national, and international applications.

The funds may also be used to defray costs of referenda.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1910.

2-35-310. Refunds.

Any cattle producer may request and receive a refund of the amount deducted from the sale of his or her cattle if he or she makes a written application with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration within forty-five (45) days from the date of sale, supported by copies of sales slips signed by the buyer and, if the application is filed before the annual accounting is made of the funds, not later than July 1 each year.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 160, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1908; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3293.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.